Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-27,163.01
Costs of health services; setoff; Department of Health and Human Services; duties; amount of setoff; priority of claims.

The Department of Health and Human Services shall use the procedures in this section and sections 77-27,160 to 77-27,173 to setoff against a debtor's income tax refund the costs of health services provided to a child of the debtor if:

(1) The debtor is required by court or administrative order to provide coverage for the costs of such services; and

(2) The debtor has received payment from a third party for the costs of such services but has not used the payment to reimburse either the other parent or guardian or the provider of such services.

The amount of the setoff shall be limited to the amount necessary to reimburse the department for its expenditures for the costs of such services under the medical assistance program established pursuant to the Medical Assistance Act. Any claim for current or past-due child support shall take priority over a claim for setoff for the costs of health services.

Laws 1994, LB 1224, § 86;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 800;

Laws 1997, LB 307, § 201;

Laws 2006, LB 1248, § 86.

Medical Assistance Act, see section 68-901.